Missouri, session 2026, HB3142.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 210, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 210.1700, to read as follows:
210.1700. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as "TJ and Heaven's
2 27 Camp Safety Act".
3 2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
4 (1) "Cabin" or "cabins", structures used to provide temporary sleeping
5 quarters for campers;
6 (2) "Camper" or "campers", minors who are attending an overnight camp or
7 residential camp on a day care or boarding basis;
8 (3) "Director", the director of the department of social services;
9 (4) "Department", the department of social services;
10 (5) "Flood plain", any area within a one-hundred-year flood plain, as designated
11 by the Federal Emergency Management Agency. "Flood plain" includes any area
12 removed from the one-hundred-year flood plain by a letter of map amendment, a letter
13 of map revision based on fill, or a substantially similar administrative process conducted
14 by the Federal Emergency Management Agency;
15 (6) "Floodway", an area identified on the most recent flood hazard map
16 published by the Federal Emergency Management Agency;
17 (7) "Governmental entity", this state or a state agency or political subdivision of
18 this state;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3142 2
19 (8) "Minor", a person under eighteen years of age;
20 (9) "Overnight camp", a program operated by a person or organization that
21 includes the hours between 9:00 p.m. and 6:00 a.m. but not for two or more sequential
22 overnights;
23 (10) "Residential camp", a program operated by a person or organization that
24 includes the hours between 9:00 p.m. and 6:00 a.m. for two or more sequential
25 overnights.
26 3. (1) No person or organization shall establish, maintain, or operate an
27 overnight camp or residential camp for minors, or to advertise or hold himself or herself
28 or itself out as being able to perform any of the services provided under this section,
29 without having in effect a written license granted by the department.
30 (2) Every overnight camp or residential camp shall disclose the licensure status
31 of the camp to the parents or guardians of the minors for which the camp provides a
32 recreational program.
33 (3) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent the department from promulgating
34 rules or regulations relating to supervision requirements and capacity limitations for
35 overnight camps or residential camps.
36 4. (1) The department shall have the following powers and duties:
37 (a) After inspection, to grant licenses to persons to operate an overnight camp or
38 residential camp if satisfied as to the good character and intent of the applicant and that
39 such applicant is qualified and equipped to render services to minors at the camp. Each
40 license shall specify the effective date;
41 (b) To inspect the conditions of the overnight camp or residential camp; inspect
42 the camp's premises and minors being served; or deny, suspend, place on probation, or
43 revoke the license of any person or organization that fails to obey the provisions of this
44 section or the rules and regulations made by the department;
45 (c) To promulgate and issue rules and regulations the department deems
46 necessary or proper in order to establish standards of service and care to be rendered by
47 such licensees; and
48 (d) To determine what records shall be kept by such persons and organizations
49 and the form thereof, and the methods to be used in keeping such records.
50 (2) The department may deny an application for a license if the department
51 determines that an overnight camp or residential camp would operate such camp in an
52 unsafe or hazardous manner. The department may, after inspection, find the licensure,
53 denial of licensure, suspension, or revocation to be in the best interest of the state.
54 5. A person holding a license issued under this section shall:

HCS HB 3142 3
55 (1) Renew the license annually by submitting a renewal application on a date
56 determined by department rule on a form provided by the department; and
57 (2) Submit a renewal application no later than the thirtieth day after the date the
58 person:
59 (a) Alters the boundaries of an overnight camp or residential camp operated by
60 the person; or
61 (b) Completes any renovation to one or more existing cabins located on the
62 premises of the camp that:
63 a. Increases or decreases the number of beds in an affected cabin; or
64 b. Alters the method of ingress or egress to an affected cabin.
65 6. (1) The department shall not issue a license or renew a license for an
66 overnight camp or residential camp under this section if the overnight camp or
67 residential camp operator is not in compliance with subsection 10 of this section or a
68 rule adopted under such subsection.
69 (2) The department shall suspend an overnight camp or residential camp license
70 issued by the department if the overnight camp or residential camp operator is in
71 violation of subsection 10 of this section. The department may reinstate the license only
72 on or after the date the department determines the overnight camp or residential camp
73 and the operator are in compliance with subsection 10 of this section.
74 7. (1) Each overnight camp or residential camp staff member or volunteer who
75 is eighteen years of age or older shall be subject to criminal background check.
76 (2) Each overnight camp or residential camp shall have at least one staff
77 member who has certified training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation.
78 8. The department shall review the camper-to-counselor ratios for overnight
79 stays at overnight camps or residential camps and provide to the director
80 recommendations regarding minimum camper-to-counselor ratios. The director, by
81 rule, shall establish minimum camper-to-counselor ratios for overnight stays at
82 overnight camps, or residential camps when applicable.
83 9. The department shall investigate each complaint filed with the department for
84 an overnight camp or residential camp to ensure that the overnight camp or residential
85 camp operator is properly implementing the camp's approved emergency plan
86 submitted as required under subsection 10 of this section.
87 10. (1) Each overnight camp or residential camp shall comply with all fire,
88 safety, health, and sanitation inspections that may be required by state law or local
89 ordinance.
90 (2) The director, by rule, shall require an overnight camp or residential camp
91 operator in the emergency plan to do the following:

HCS HB 3142 4
92 (a) Specify muster zones for campers and camp staff to gather in an emergency
93 event that requires evacuation from any location within the premises of the camp;
94 (b) Establish procedures for responding to an emergency event, including:
95 a. A lost camper;
96 b. A fire on the premises of the camp;
97 c. A severe injury, severe illness, serious accident, or death of one or more
98 campers, visitors, camp staff, or camp volunteers that occurs:
99 (i) On the camp premises; or
100 (ii) While under the supervision of camp staff;
101 d. An aquatic emergency if the camp borders a watercourse, lake, pond, or any
102 other body of water;
103 e. An epidemic;
104 f. An unauthorized or unknown individual present on the camp's premises;
105 g. A transportation emergency; and
106 h. Any other natural disaster or emergency event required under department
107 rules;
108 (c) Establish procedures to identify and account for each camper affected by the
109 emergency event;
110 (d) Establish procedures to notify and communicate with:
111 a. Local law enforcement agencies;
112 b. Camp administrative and medical services staff; and
113 c. The parents or legal guardians of each camper identified under paragraph (c)
114 of this subdivision; and
115 (e) Designate a camp emergency preparedness coordinator.
116 (3) The director, by rule, shall require an overnight camp or residential camp
117 operator to, at each overnight camp or residential camp the operator operates:
118 (a) Maintain at the camp an operable radio capable of providing real-time
119 weather alerts issued by the National Weather Service or a similar professional weather
120 service;
121 (b) Install and maintain at the camp an emergency warning system that is
122 capable of alerting all campers and camp occupants of an emergency;
123 (c) Monitor safety alerts issued:
124 a. By the National Weather Service or a similar professional weather service;
125 and
126 b. By local river authorities, if applicable to the camp, or through other local
127 emergency notification systems; and
128 (d) Certify the operator's compliance with this subdivision.

HCS HB 3142 5
129 (4) In developing an overnight camp's or residential camp's emergency plan, an
130 overnight camp or residential camp operator shall annually submit the initial or
131 updated plan to the department for approval in the form and manner prescribed by the
132 department.
133 (5) If the department determines an overnight camp's or residential camp's
134 submitted emergency plan does not meet the minimum standards prescribed by
135 department rules, the overnight camp or residential camp operator shall revise and
136 resubmit the plan no later than the forty-fifth day after the date the operator receives
137 notice from the department of the plan's deficiencies.
138 (6) An overnight camp or residential camp operator shall include any updated
139 overnight camp or residential camp emergency plan as an attachment to each
140 application to renew the operator's license under subsection 5 of this section.
141 (7) Notwithstanding any provision of law, no later than the tenth business day
142 following the date the department approves an overnight camp's or residential camp's
143 emergency plan or, if the department determines the plan is deficient under subdivision
144 (5) of this subsection, the operator shall provide a copy of the plan to:
145 (a) The director of the emergency management agency of the county in which
146 the camp is located; and
147 (b) The law enforcement agency or county sheriff's office where the camp is
148 located.
149 (8) In developing an overnight camp's or residential camp's emergency plan, an
150 overnight camp or residential camp operator may consult with an emergency
151 management director described by subdivision (7) of this section.
152 (9) The department shall store in a digital database each emergency plan
153 submitted to the department under this section and provide access to that database to
154 the state emergency management agency.
155 (10) An overnight camp or residential camp operator shall:
156 (a) Provide the most recent version of an overnight camp's or residential camp's
157 emergency plan submitted under this subsection to the parent or legal guardian of:
158 a. A camper who is participating in a camp session; or
159 b. A prospective camper who is registered to participate in a future camp
160 session;
161 (b) Notify the parent or legal guardian of a camper or prospective camper
162 described in paragraph (a) of this subdivision if any area of the camp is located within a
163 flood plain; and

HCS HB 3142 6
164 (c) Ensure that the parent or legal guardian signs and submits to the operator a
165 statement acknowledging receipt of the notice required under paragraph (b) of this
166 subdivision.
167 (11) Not more than forty-eight hours after each overnight camp or residential
168 camp session begins, the overnight camp or residential camp operator or an overnight
169 camp or residential camp staff member shall conduct a mandatory safety orientation
170 that:
171 (a) Notifies each camper of the camp's boundaries and any hazards present on
172 the camp premises;
173 (b) Instructs each camper on behavioral expectations in an emergency event;
174 and
175 (c) Provides each camper with developmentally appropriate instruction on the
176 appropriate actions and procedures to follow in an emergency event, in accordance with
177 the camp's emergency plan required under this subsection.
178 (12) At least once a year, an overnight camp or residential camp operator shall:
179 (a) Provide each overnight camp or residential camp staff member and
180 volunteer with a copy of the camp's most recent emergency plan;
181 (b) Ensure each staff member and volunteer successfully completes training on
182 the camp's emergency plan;
183 (c) Instruct each staff member and volunteer on the proper procedures to follow
184 in an emergency event under the plan; and
185 (d) Maintain written records documenting each staff member's and volunteer's
186 successful completion of the training required under this subdivision.
187 (13) An overnight camp or residential camp operator shall conspicuously post in
188 each cabin on the overnight camp or residential camp premises the proper evacuation
189 route described in the overnight camp or residential camp's emergency plan.
190 (14) An emergency plan submitted to, received by, or accessed by the
191 department, the Missouri state emergency management agency, an emergency
192 management agency director, or any other governmental entity under this subsection
193 is confidential and not subject to disclosure under chapter 610.
194 11. (1) Any person or organization that makes materially false statements in
195 order to obtain a license or the renewal thereof under this section shall be guilty of a
196 class C misdemeanor for the first offense and shall be assessed a fine not to exceed seven
197 hundred fifty dollars and shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor and shall be assessed
198 a fine of up to two thousand dollars per day, not to exceed a total of ten thousand dollars
199 for subsequent offenses.

HCS HB 3142 7
200 (2) If the department proposes to deny, suspend, place on probation or revoke a
201 license, the department shall serve upon the applicant or licensee written notice of the
202 proposed action to be taken. The notice shall contain a statement of the type of action
203 proposed, the basis for it, the date the action will become effective, and a statement that
204 the applicant or licensee shall have thirty days to request in writing a hearing before the
205 administrative hearing commission and that such request shall be made to the
206 department. If no written request for a hearing is received by the department within
207 thirty days of the delivery or mailing by certified mail of the notice to the applicant or
208 licensee, the proposed discipline shall take effect on the thirty-first day after such
209 delivery or mailing of the notice to the applicant or licensee. If the applicant or licensee
210 makes a written request for a hearing, the department shall file a complaint with the
211 administrative hearing commission within ninety days of receipt of the request for a
212 hearing.
213 (3) The department may issue letters of censure or warning without formal
214 notice or hearing. Additionally, the department may place a licensee on probation
215 under chapter 621.
216 (4) The department may suspend any license simultaneously with the notice of
217 the proposed action to be taken in subdivision (2) of this subsection if the department
218 finds that there is a threat of imminent bodily harm to the minors at the overnight camp
219 or residential camp. The notice of suspension shall include the basis of the suspension
220 and the appeal rights of the licensee under this subsection. The licensee may appeal the
221 decision to suspend the license to the department. The appeal shall be filed within ten
222 days from the delivery or mailing by certified mail of the notice of appeal. A hearing
223 shall be conducted by the department within ten days from the date the appeal is
224 filed. The suspension shall continue in effect until the conclusion of the proceedings,
225 including review thereof, unless sooner withdrawn by the department, dissolved by a
226 court of competent jurisdiction or stayed by the administrative hearing
227 commission. Any person aggrieved by a final decision of the department made under
228 this section shall be entitled to judicial review in accordance with chapter 536.
229 (5) In addition to initiating proceedings under subdivision (1) of this subsection,
230 or in lieu thereof, the prosecuting attorney of the county where the overnight camp or
231 residential is located may file suit for a preliminary and permanent order overseeing or
232 preventing the operation of the overnight camp or residential camp for violating any
233 provision of this section. The order shall remain in force until such a time as the court
234 determines that the overnight camp or residential camp is in substantial compliance. If
235 the prosecuting attorney refuses to act or fails to act after receipt of notice from the

HCS HB 3142 8
236 department, the department may request that the attorney general seek an injunction of
237 the operation of such camp.
238 12. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any overnight camp or
239 residential camp offered by an institution of higher education located in this state.
240 13. The department shall promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
241 administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
242 section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
243 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
244 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
245 and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
246 review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
247 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
248 adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔